Utah statutes.
32B-5-310.   Notifying department of change in ownership.

The commission may suspend or revoke a retail license if the retail licensee does not immediately notify the department of a change in:

(1)  ownership of the premises of the retail license;

(2)  for a corporate owner, the:

(a)  corporate officers or directors of the retail licensee; or

(b)  shareholders holding at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of the corporation; or

(3)  for a limited liability company:

(a)  managers of the limited liability company; or

(b)  members owning at least 20% of the limited liability company.

